Oklahoma, session 2026, SB986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773 of Title 15, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Ancillary good or service” means any additional good or


goods or additional service or services offered to a consumer as


part of a transaction;


2. “Business” means an individual, corporation, partnership,


association, or any other entity that offers goods or services


including, but not limited to, online, in mobile applications, and


in physical locations;

Req. No. 26 Page 1


3. “Clear and conspicuous” or “clearly and conspicuously” means


a required disclosure is easily noticeable and easily understandable


by consumers, as follows:


a. in any communication that is solely visual or solely


audible, the disclosure shall be made through the same


means by which the communication is presented. In any


communication made through both visual and audible


means, the disclosure shall be presented


simultaneously in both the visual and audible portions


of the communication even if the presentation


requiring the disclosure is made in only one means,


b. a visual disclosure, by size, contrast, location, the


length of time viewable, and other characteristics,


shall stand out from any accompanying text or visual


elements so that it is easily noticed, read, and


understood,


c. an audible disclosure, including by telephone or


streaming video, shall be delivered in a volume,


speed, and cadence sufficient for ease of


understanding,


d. in any communication using an interactive electronic


medium, such as on the Internet, mobile application,


or software, the disclosure shall be unavoidable,



Req. No. 26 Page 2


e. the disclosure shall use diction and syntax


understandable to consumers and shall appear in each


language in which the representation that requires the


disclosure appears,


f. the disclosure shall comply with these requirements in


each medium through which it is received, including


all electronic devices and face-to-face communication,


and


g. the disclosure shall not be contradicted or mitigated


by, or inconsistent with, anything else in the


communication;


4. “Covered good or service” means:


a. live-event tickets, and


b. short-term lodging including, but not limited to,


temporary sleeping accommodations at a hotel, motel,


inn, short-term rental, vacation rental, or other


place of lodging;


5. “Government charges” means the fees or charges imposed on


the transaction by a federal, state, trial, or local government


agency, unit, or department;


6. “Pricing information” means any information relating to an


amount a consumer may pay;


7. “Shipping charges” means the fees or charges that reasonably


reflect the amount a business incurs to send physical goods to a

Req. No. 26 Page 3


consumer including, but not limited to, through the mail, private


mail and shipping services, or by freight; and


8. “Total price” means the maximum total of all fees or charges


a consumer shall pay for any good or goods or service or services


along with any mandatory ancillary good or service. Government


charges, shipping charges, and fees or charges for any optional


ancillary good or service may be excluded from the provisions of


this act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.1 of Title 15, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It shall be unlawful for any business to offer, display, or


advertise any price of a covered good or service without clearly and


conspicuously disclosing the total price.


B. In any offer, display, or advertisement that represents any


price of a covered good or service, a business shall disclose the


total price more prominently than any other pricing information.


Where the final amount of payment for the transaction is displayed,


the final amount of payment shall be disclosed more prominently


than, or as prominently as, the total price.


C. A business shall disclose clearly and conspicuously, before


the consumer consents to pay for any covered good or service:


1. The nature, purpose, and amount of any fee or charge imposed


on the transaction that has been excluded from the total price and

Req. No. 26 Page 4


the identity of the good or service for which the fee or charge is


imposed; and


2. The final amount of payment for the transaction.


D. It shall be considered an unfair and deceptive practice


under the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act for any business in any


offer, display, or advertisement for a covered good or service to


misrepresent any fee or charge including, but not limited to, the


nature, purpose, amount, or refundability of any fee or charge, and


the identity of the good or service for which the fee or charge is


imposed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-26 MR 1/19/2025 5:47:15 AM























Req. No. 26 Page 5